New York, session 2025-2026, A5959.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 499-bbbb of the real property tax law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. Notwithstanding any limitations or restrictions established within 4 this section or any local law or resolution, any eligible building that 5 is owned by a corporation, association, organization or trust described 6 in section 501(c)(3) of the United States internal revenue code, incor- 7 porated under article two, four, five, or eleven of the private housing 8 finance law, or is an income-restricted affordable housing property, 9 including but not limited to properties with regulatory agreements with 10 the New York city department of housing preservation and development, 11 New York city housing development corporation, New York state department 12 of housing and community renewal, or the United States department of 13 housing and urban development, shall be eligible for a direct-pay credit 14 equal to the monetary value of the abatement as calculated in paragraph 15 (f) of subdivision one of this section, provided, however, for the 16 purposes of this subdivision, the monetary value of the abatement as 17 calculated in paragraph (f) of subdivision one of this section shall not 18 take into consideration the amount of taxes payable in such tax year. 19 Such direct-pay credit shall be issued to the eligible building owner by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07664-03-6 A. 5959--A 2 1 the department of finance in the form of a check irrespective of the 2 amount of taxes payable in such tax year. 3 § 2. The section heading and subdivisions 1, 4, 5 and 6 of section 4 499-cccc of the real property tax law, the section heading and subdivi- 5 sions 4, 5 and 6 as added by chapter 473 of the laws of 2008, subdivi- 6 sion 1 as amended by chapter 485 of the laws of 2023, are amended to 7 read as follows: 8 Application for tax abatement or direct-pay credit. 1. To obtain a tax 9 abatement or direct-pay credit pursuant to this title, an applicant must 10 file an application for tax abatement, which may be filed on or after 11 January first, two thousand nine, and on or before January first, two 12 thousand thirty-six. 13 4. An application for tax abatement or direct-pay credit shall be in 14 any format prescribed by a designated agency, including electronic form. 15 5. An application for tax abatement or direct-pay credit shall be 16 approved by a designated agency upon determining that the applicant has 17 submitted proof acceptable to such agency that the requirements for 18 obtaining a tax abatement or direct-pay credit pursuant to this title 19 and the rules promulgated hereunder have been met. The burden of proof 20 shall be on the applicant to show by clear and convincing evidence that 21 the requirements for granting a tax abatement or direct-pay credit have 22 been satisfied. 23 6. Upon notification from a designated agency that an application for 24 tax abatement or direct-pay credit has been approved, the department of 25 finance shall apply the tax abatement or direct-pay credit, provided 26 there are no outstanding real estate taxes, water and sewer charges, 27 payments in lieu of taxes or other municipal charges with respect to the 28 eligible building. 29 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.